Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-204 of Title 29, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Nonresidents may not hunt or fish in any Oklahoma Wildlife
Management Area unless the person has first obtained an Oklahoma
Habitat Stamp from the Director of the Oklahoma Wildlife
Req. No. 10013 Page 1

Cons ervation Commission or authorized agents of the Director. Each
person shall have the permit in addition to all other required
licenses, stamps, and permits when hunting in an Oklahoma Wildlife
Management Area.
B. Persons excepted from the Oklahoma Habitat Stamp
requirements of this section are:
1. Nonresident active-duty military personnel stationed at
military installations located in this state; and
2. Nonresident veterans.
C. The Oklahoma Habitat Stamp shall be Eighty-five Dollars
($85.00). The fee shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Habitat Stamp
Revolving Fund, to be used exclusively for maintenance and
improvements to Oklahoma Wildlife Management Areas.
D. An Oklahoma Habitat Stamp is valid for a period of one (1)
year from the date of purchase.
E. The Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall
prescribe, by rule, the form, design, and manner of issuance of the
Oklahoma Habitat Stamp.
F. 1. Any nonresident arrested for hunting in an Oklahoma
Wildlife Management Area without an Oklahoma Habitat Stamp as
required by the provisions of subsection A of this section may
purchase a substitute temporary thirty-day stamp from the arresting
game warden in lieu of posting bond. The fee for a substitute stamp

Req. No. 10013 Page 2

purc hased pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be One
Hundred Forty-five Dollars ($145.00).
2. The fees from the temporary substitute stamp pursuant to the
provisions of this subsection shall be deposited in the Oklahoma
Habitat Stamp Revolving Fund, to be used exclusively for maintenance
and improvements to Oklahoma Wildlife Management Areas.
G. Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of
this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than Twenty-
five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-205 of Title 29, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission to be designated
the "Oklahoma Habitat Stamp Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a
continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall
consist of all monies received pursuant to the provisions of this
section from fees for the Oklahoma Habitat Stamp and required to be
deposited in the fund. All monies accruing to the credit of the
fund are hereby appropriated and shall be expended by the Commission
for the purpose of Oklahoma Wildlife Management Area maintenance and
improvements. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as

Req. No. 10013 Page 3

pres cribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10013 JL 11/18/24



















Req. No. 10013 Page 4